Wyoming, session 2025, SF0079.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-7-103 is created to read:
1-7-103. Change of venue in civil actions.
(a) For any civil action brought in an incorrect
venue, the district court may, on its own or upon motion of
the parties, order the action to be transferred to a court
that would be a proper venue.
(b) For purposes of this section, an action timely
filed in an incorrect venue and transferred to a proper
venue under this section shall be deemed to be timely filed
in the proper venue.
(c) The supreme court may adopt rules governing
proceedings under this section.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0079
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2